Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 414.
SECTION 2. Medical assistance shall be provided to an individual who:
(1) Is at least 18 years of age and not older than 25 years of age;
(2) Resides in this state;
(3) Was in foster care in the custody of any state on the  date the individual attained 18
years of age; and
(4) Was enrolled in medical assistance  in this state or another state while in foster care.
SECTION 3.
The Oregon Health Authority shall seek federal approval to secure the re-
ceipt of federal financial participation in the costs of providing medical assistance to  indi-
viduals described in section 2 of this 2025 Act who were in foster care in another state.
Passed by Senate March 25, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 19, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 945 (SB 945-INTRO) Page 1